Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-763
Blanket sickness and accident insurance; individual application not required; individual certificate unnecessary.

An individual application shall not be required from a person covered under a blanket policy or contract of sickness and accident insurance nor shall it be necessary for the insurer to furnish each person a certificate.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 17(2), p. 470;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 154.